Alabama, session 2026rs, HB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Commencing June 1, 2026, the Sheriff of
St. Clair County, in addition to the compensation the sheriff
received on May 31, 2026, shall receive an additional expense
allowance in an amount that brings the sheriff's total annual
compensation to one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000).
(b) Commencing January 18, 2027, the total base annual
salary for the sheriff shall be one hundred sixty thousand
dollars ($160,000), in lieu of all other expense allowances
and other forms of compensation.
Page 1

and other forms of compensation.
HB112 Enrolled
Section 2. Commencing June 1, 2026, the total base
annual salary of the Judge of Probate of St. Clair County
shall be one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000), in
lieu of all other expense allowances and other forms of
compensation.
Section 3. (a) Commencing June 1, 2026, the Revenue
Commissioner of St. Clair County, in addition to the
compensation the revenue commissioner received on May 31,
2026, shall receive an additional expense allowance in an
amount that brings the revenue commissioner's total annual
compensation to one hundred thirty thousand dollars
($130,000).
(b) Commencing October 1, 2027, the total base annual
salary for the revenue commissioner shall be one hundred
thirty thousand dollars ($130,000), in lieu of all other
expense allowances and other forms of compensation.
Section 4. (a) Commencing June 1, 2026, the Chair of
the St. Clair County Commission, in addition to the
compensation the chair received on May 31, 2026, shall receive
an additional expense allowance in an amount that brings the
chair's total annual compensation to one hundred thirty
thousand dollars ($130,000).
(b) Commencing November 11, 2026, the total base annual
salary for the chair shall be one hundred thirty thousand
dollars ($130,000), in lieu of all other expense allowances
and other forms of compensation.
Section 5. (a) Commencing June 1, 2026, each non-chair
member of the St. Clair County Commission, in addition to the
Page 2

member of the St. Clair County Commission, in addition to the
HB112 Enrolled
compensation each member received on May 31, 2026, shall
receive an additional expense allowance in an amount that
brings each member's total annual compensation to forty-five
thousand dollars ($45,000).
(b) Commencing November 11, 2026, the total base annual
salary for each member shall be forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000), in lieu of all other expense allowances and other
forms of compensation.
Section 6. Act 80-195 (1980 Regular Session, p. 270),
Act 84-74 (1984 Regular Session, p. 106), Act 92-483 (1992
Regular Session, p. 959), Act 96-412 (1996 Regular Session, p.
519), Act 2005-102 (2005 Regular Session), Act 2013-395 (2013
Regular Session), Act 2017-89 (2017 Regular Session), Act
2019-135 (2019 Regular Session), Act 2023-120 (2023 Regular
Session), Act 2025-113 (2025 Regular Session), Section 2 of
Act 1855-25 (1855-1856 Regular Session), Section 1 of Act
2000-560 (2000 Regular Session), and Sections 2, 3, and 4 of
Act 2020-182 (2020 Regular Session), relating to the
compensation of the sheriff, revenue commissioner, judge of
probate, and the chair and other members of the county
commission, are repealed.
Section 7. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB112 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
100 was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.
101
102 John Treadwell
103 Clerk
104
105
106
107
108
109 Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed
110
111
112
Page 4